California, session 20252026, SB716.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Due to the loss of federal support for broadband affordability through the federal Affordable Connectivity Program, the financial pressure of supporting broadband affordability through subsidies has fallen to the states.(b) At the same time, the Trump administration has made it difficult for states to mandate broadband affordability without putting at risk significant sums of infrastructure funding.(c) Nonetheless, California remains committed to our values and our history of supporting basic communication needs through the lifeline program.(d) The lifeline program must evolve to meet the advanced communication needs of modern life such as broadband access, which will introduce a new cost pressure to the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund that current reserves may absorb.(e) Internet service providers who stand to benefit from this legislation do not currently contribute to the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund and federal preemption policies are a significant barrier to requiring them to pay their fair share.(f) The Legislature may wish to consider future options to revise the funding mechanism for the lifeline program to ensure the entities and providers that benefit from the program pay their fair share to support broadband accessibility and affordability for low-income Californians.(g) As the current California Lifeline program allows for technology neutrality, the Legislature remains committed to ensuring a technology neutral approach for the lifeline program.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 873.5 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:873.5. (a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Affiliate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.(2) “Eligible telecommunications carrier” has the same meaning as described in Section 214 of Title 47 of the United States Code.(3) “Household” has the same meaning as defined in Section 878.(4) “Internet service provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3100 of the Civil Code.(5) “Small independent telephone corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 275.6.(b) As part of a new or existing proceeding, the commission shall establish a mechanism to permit internet service providers to voluntarily include standalone stand-alone broadband internet access service as a class of lifeline service. service, subject to the requirements and limitations of this section.(c) (1) An internet service provider shall be eligible for a lifeline subsidy if it offers at least one internet service plan that provides broadband internet access service at a speed of at least 100 megabits per second downstream and 20 megabits per second upstream and costs thirty dollars ($30) or less per month.(2) The commission may adjust the speed and monthly cost specified in paragraph (1) for an area of the state where no participating internet service provider at that time offers broadband internet access service at that speed and cost, including an area of the state served by an internet service provider that is an affiliate of a small independent telephone corporation.(d) (1) The commission shall not require a lifeline subscriber to bundle their voice and internet service plans to receive a lifeline subsidy pursuant to this section.(2) The commission may adopt a mechanism to ensure that a lifeline subscriber who receives a lifeline subsidy pursuant to this section has sufficient access to voice service.(3) A lifeline subscriber may elect to apply a lifeline subsidy to any eligible internet service plan offered by a participating internet service provider.(4) The commission shall not provide a lifeline subscriber with more than one lifeline subsidy per household under this article, consistent with Section 878, except that a lifeline subscriber may also obtain a subsidy pursuant to a federally established program.(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an internet service provider shall not be required to obtain an eligible telecommunications carrier designation to offer lifeline service pursuant to this section.(2) (A) The commission shall establish an expedited advice letter process for an internet service provider that is an affiliate of a small independent telephone corporation to have the option to become an eligible telecommunications carrier for the purpose of accessing federal support to provide discounted broadband internet access service to qualifying low-income customers.(B) An internet service provider designated as an eligible telecommunications carrier pursuant to this paragraph is not required to provide voice service to the area where the internet service provider is designated as an eligible telecommunications carrier if it has an affiliate that offers voice service to all customers located in that area.(f) (1) The commission shall prohibit an internet service provider that offers lifeline service pursuant to this section from the inappropriate upselling of its internet service plans.(2) The prohibition in paragraph (1) only applies to the sale of an internet service plan to a lifeline subscriber for the purposes purpose of applying the lifeline subsidy. It does not preclude prohibit an internet service provider from providing a lifeline subscriber with information about other services offered by the internet service provider.(g) On or before December 31, 2026, the commission shall submit an estimate of any increase to the Universal Service Public Purpose Programs surcharge rate required for the implementation of this section in writing to the Assembly and Senate budget committees and the relevant policy committees in each house of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(h) The commission shall not increase the surcharge for the lifeline program above the highest rate collected within the previous four years, as of January 1, 2026.(h)(i) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.(2) This section only applies to the lifeline subsidy established pursuant to this section.(i)(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 914.8 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:914.8. (a) On or before July 1, 2028, the commission shall, as part of an annual report prepared pursuant to Section 914.1, report to the Legislature on the performance and fiscal impact of the lifeline program, including all of the following:(1) The overall increase or change in program participation.(2) The number of participants switching from telephone to broadband service.(3) The number of participants that applied their subsidy to a bundled service offering.(b) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.SEC. 2.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.